Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB728.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 525.080 is amended to read as follows:
(1) A person is guilty of harassing communications when, with intent to intimidate,
harass, annoy, or alarm another person, he or she:
(a) Communicates with a person, anonymously or otherwise, by telephone,
telegraph, mail, or any other form of electronic or written communication in a
manner which causes annoyance or alarm and serves no purpose of legitimate
communication;
(b) Makes a telephone call, whether or not conversation ensues, with no purpose
of legitimate communication; or
(c) Communicates, while enrolled as a student in a local school district, with or
about another school student, anonymously or otherwise, by telephone, the
internet, telegraph, mail, or any other form of electronic or written
communication in a manner which a reasonable person under the
circumstances should know would cause the other student to suffer fear of
physical harm, intimidation, humiliation, or embarrassment and which serves
no purpose of legitimate communication.
(2) Harassing communications is a:
(a) Class B misdemeanor for the first offense;
(b) Class A misdemeanor for the second offense; and
(c) Class D felony:
1. For the third or subsequent offense; or
2. When a person intentionally conceals his or her identity to make
communication anonymous.
Page 1 of 1
XXXX 2/19/2026 2:46 PM Jacketed